Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 7 Adult Residential Mental Health Services Licensing

Effective date.

This article became effective July 1, 2022. See the delayed effective date note for Code Section 37-3-206 for funding contingency impacting the effective date of that provision.

37-3-200.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Adult Residential Mental Health Services Licensing Act.”

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-201.
Purpose.

The purpose of this article is to provide for the classification and systematic evaluation, licensure, and monitoring of residential programs designed for the treatment and therapeutic recovery of adult persons with a primary diagnosis or assessment of
a psychotic disorder, mood disorder, anxiety disorder, dissociative disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder, adjustment disorder, personality disorder, or trauma and stress related disorder; to ensure that every governing body which
operates an adult residential mental health program is licensed to do so; and to meet the rehabilitative and recovery needs and supports of persons who have mental illnesses while safeguarding their individual liberties as well as
public safety.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-202.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Adult residential mental health program” means a subacute residential alternative service of four or more residential beds authorized to provide psychiatric services for mentally ill persons 18 years of age or older that operates 24 hours per day, 7
days per week to provide intensive short-term noninstitutional treatment to individuals who are temporarily in need of a 24-hour-per-day supportive therapeutic setting for prevention of or transition from or after acute psychiatric
hospitalization. Such term shall not include crisis stabilization units, as defined in Code Section 37-1-29; community living arrangements, as defined by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities; mental
health programs conducted by accountability courts; or residential beds operated by a state or local public entity.

“Applicant” means any individual affiliated with a partnership, corporation, association, or individuals or groups of individuals submitting an application to operate an adult residential mental health program under this article.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Governing body” means the partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or person or group of persons who maintains and controls the adult residential mental health program and who is legally responsible for its operation.

“License” means the official permit issued by the department which authorizes the holder to operate an adult residential mental health program.

“Licensee” means any person holding a license issued by the department under this article.

“Mentally ill person” means a person who has significant deficits in functioning affecting social and family relationships, work, self-care, educational goals, or legal involvements due to his or her primary diagnosis or assessment of a psychotic disorder,
mood disorder, anxiety disorder, dissociative disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder, adjustment disorder, personality disorder, or trauma and stress related disorder as listed in the American Psychiatric Association’s Diagnostic
and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-5) or the World Health Organization’s International Classification of Diseases, in effect as of July 1, 2022, or as the department may further define such term by rule and regulation.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-203.
Classification of residential programs.

The department is authorized to classify all adult residential mental health programs within the state according to the character and range of services provided.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-204.
Regulations establishing minimum standards.

The department shall create and promulgate minimum standards of quality and services for each designated class of programs. At least the following areas shall be covered in the rules and regulations:

Admission criteria which at a minimum must require a referral from either an inpatient psychiatric hospital that is discharging a patient to an adult residential mental health program or a determination by a qualified psychiatrist that admission is required
to provide stabilization, treatment, and care of the condition but an inpatient admission to a psychiatric hospital is not required; and length of stay criteria which at a minimum shall be redetermined on a periodic basis through
a mental health evaluation to include treatment goals and progress from the initial admission. Such mental health evaluation shall determine medical necessity for continued stay in the residential program with a maximum length
of stay of six months unless an individual case waiver is approved by the department;

Adequate and safe buildings or housing facilities where programs are offered and standards for emergency conditions relating to them;

Adequate equipment for the delivery of adult residential mental health programs;

Standards for sufficient trained staff or staff with prior experience who are competent in the duties they are to perform which, at a minimum, shall include a psychiatrist or other physician when the psychiatrist is unavailable, a registered professional
nurse or advanced practice registered nurse, appropriately trained clinical case management staff to facilitate care and safe discharge planning, and mental health technicians or other similarly trained paraprofessionals or certified
peer specialists at a ratio of not less than one to 12 patients or greater as assessed needs and history of the patient population indicates;

The content and quality of services to be provided;

Requirements for intake, discharge, and aftercare of mentally ill persons; financial relationships or arrangements with patients of the program; and visitation of patients;

Referral arrangements to other appropriate agencies or facilities, including a process and adequate staff to facilitate transfer of a patient to a licensed general or specialty hospital authorized to provide inpatient medical or psychiatric services;

Maintenance of adequate records on each mentally ill person treated or advised;

Standards for the storage, administration, and dispensing of prescribed medications to patients in programs licensed under this article, in accordance with guidelines established by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration and the Georgia Board
of Pharmacy;

Permission for the use of therapeutic modalities and complementary services beneficial to the treatment of and supports for adult mentally ill persons;

Permission and standards for the regulation or control and provision of food and other nutrition in each setting or classification of an adult residential mental health program;

Standards for protection of patient rights while resident in a program and internal grievance procedures;

Standards for the ethics and integrity of the staff, owners, and governing body of the program;

Standards to ensure protection of the resident and the community at large in the event a resident poses a risk of potential harm to self or others; and

Standards and procedures for incident reports to the department in the event of the occurrence of major incidents and provision for appropriate departmental actions and appeal thereof.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-205.
Regulatory and licensing authority.

The department is authorized and directed to create and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this article no later than July 1, 2023.

The department is further authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses or take other enforcement actions against licensees or applicants as provided in Code Section 31-2-8.

All rules and regulations and any enforcement actions initiated by the department shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-206.
[For effective date, see note.] Licensing requirement; funding contingency.

On and after January 1, 2024, no governing body shall operate an adult residential mental health program without having a valid license or provisional license issued pursuant to this article; provided, however, that hospitals licensed in accordance with
Chapter 7 of Title 31 are exempt from this article unless the hospital is operating an adult residential mental health program that is separate and distinct from the licensed hospital.

This Code section shall become effective only upon the effective date of a specific appropriation of funds for purposes of this article, as expressed in a line item making specific reference to this article in a General Appropriations Act enacted by the
General Assembly.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-206

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

Delayed effective date.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069, as reflected in subsection (b) of this Code section, provides that this Code section becomes effective only when funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of the Act in an Appropriations Act making specific
reference to this Act. Funds were not appropriated at the 2022 session of the General Assembly.

37-3-207.
Applications; proof of compliance.

Application for a license to operate an adult residential mental health program shall be submitted by the governing body to the department in the manner prescribed in the department’s rules and regulations and shall contain a comprehensive outline of
the program to be offered by the applicant.

Proof of compliance with all applicable federal and state laws for the handling and dispensing of medications, and all state and local health, safety, sanitation, building, and zoning codes shall be attached to the application submitted to the department.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-207

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-208.
Provisional licensing; terms.

The department may issue a provisional license effective for a period not to exceed 90 days to each applicant who has substantially complied with all requirements for a regular license. Provisional licenses shall be renewed in the discretion of the department
only in cases of extreme hardship and in no case for longer than 90 days.

The obligations and conditions of a provisional license shall be the same as those of a regular license except as otherwise provided for in this article.

The duration limits included in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to one-time provisional licenses issued by the department pursuant to Code Section 37-3-208.1.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-208

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-208.1.
One-time provisional license.

Between July 1, 2022, and December 31, 2023, the department shall be authorized to grant a one-time provisional license for an adult residential mental health program to an existing licensed personal care home that substantially complies with the requirements
of this article for a period not to extend beyond December 31, 2023.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-208.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-209.
Proof of accreditation.

The department may accept proof of accreditation by a nationally recognized healthcare accreditation body, in accordance with specific standards, as evidence of compliance with one or more departmental requirements for issuance or renewal of a license
or provisional license.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-209

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-210.
Nontransferable licensing.

The department shall issue a license to a governing body for any adult residential mental health program which meets all the rules and regulations for the class of license applied for. The license shall be nontransferable for a change of location or governing
body.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-211.
Denial, suspension or revocation of license.

The department is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this chapter for a violation of this chapter or a rule or regulation adopted under this chapter or to take other disciplinary actions against licensees as provided in Code
Section 31-2-8.

The denial, suspension, or revocation of a license by the department shall be a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-211

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-212.
Confidentiality of records and names of mentally ill persons seeking treatment.

For the purpose of providing more effective treatment and rehabilitation, the records and name of any mentally ill person who seeks or obtains treatment, therapeutic advice, or counsel from any adult residential mental health program licensed under this
article shall be confidential and shall not be revealed except to the extent authorized in writing by the mentally ill person affected or his or her guardian or custodian; furthermore, any communication by such mentally ill person
to an authorized employee of any holder of a license shall be deemed confidential; provided, however, that, except for matters privileged under other laws of this state, the records of such person and information about such person
shall be produced in response to a valid court order of any court of competent jurisdiction after a full and fair show-cause hearing and in response to a departmental request for access for licensing purposes when such request is accompanied
by a written statement that no record of patient identifying information will be made. The protections in this Code section and other provisions of state or federal law of an individual client’s identity or communications to the clinical
staff of any adult residential mental health program licensed under this article shall not prohibit the use of de-identified data relating to such clients for clinical or programmatic research or education or in presentations about
the programs offered by a licensee under this article. Subject to and in compliance with the limitations of any state or federal privacy laws, the department may require at reasonable intervals, and each licensee shall furnish, copies
of summary records of each mentally ill person treated or advised pursuant to an adult residential mental health program.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-212

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-213.
On-site inspections.

The department shall conduct periodic on-site inspection of each adult residential mental health program licensed in this state. Such inspection shall include, but shall not be limited to, the premises, staff, persons in care, and documents pertinent
to the continued licensing of such adult residential mental health program so that the department may determine whether a provider is operating in compliance with licensing requirements. Each licensee shall permit authorized department
representatives to enter upon and inspect any and all premises upon or in which a program is to be conducted, for which a license has been applied, or for which a license has been issued so that verification of compliance with all
relevant laws or regulations can be made.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-213

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-214.
Role of disability services ombudsman.

The powers of the disability services ombudsman established in Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title shall include oversight of patients of adult residential mental health programs established by this article, with all attendant powers and functions
specified by law for such ombudsman.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-214

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.

37-3-215.
Unlicensed residential mental health program; penalty.

On and after January 1, 2024, a facility shall be deemed to be an “unlicensed adult residential mental health program” if it is unlicensed and not exempt from licensure under this article and:

The facility is providing services and is operating as an adult residential mental health program;

The facility is held out as or represented as providing services and operating as an adult residential mental health program; or

The facility represents itself as a licensed adult residential mental health program.

Any unlicensed adult residential mental health program may be assessed by the department, after opportunity for hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” a civil penalty in the amount
of $100.00 per bed per day for each day of violation. The department shall send a notice by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery stating that licensure is required and the department’s intent to impose a civil penalty.
Such notice shall be deemed to be constructively received on the date of the first attempt to deliver such notice by the United States Postal Service. The department shall take no action to collect such civil penalty until after
opportunity for a hearing.

In addition to other remedies available to the department, the civil penalty authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be doubled if the owner or operator continues to operate the unlicensed adult residential mental health program, after
receipt of notice pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

The owner or operator of an unlicensed adult residential mental health program who is assessed a civil penalty in accordance with this Code section may have review of such civil penalty by appeal to the superior court in the county in which the action
arose or to the Superior Court of Fulton County.

Any person who owns or operates an adult residential mental health program in violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for a first violation, unless such violation is in conjunction with a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of
Title 16, in which case such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years. Upon conviction for a second or subsequent such violation,
such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten years.

History. Code 1981, §

37-3-215

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 1/HB 1069.